Montana, session 2025, HB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-1-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-1-301. Election administrator. (1) (a) The county clerk and recorder of each county is the
election administrator unless the governing body of the county designates another official or appoints an
election administrator.
(b) If the governing body of the county appoints an election administrator, that individual shall
report directly to the governing body of the county.
(2) The election administrator is responsible for the administration of all procedures relating to
registration of electors and conduct of elections, shall keep all county records relating to elector registration and
elections, and is the primary point of contact for the county with respect to the statewide voter registration list
and implementation of other provisions of applicable federal law governing elections.
(3) The election administrator may appoint a deputy election administrator for each political
subdivision required to hold elections."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 293
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 293, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 293
INTRODUCED BY T. MILLETT, J. WEBER, C. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT REVISING ELECTION ADMINISTRATOR LAWS; REQUIRING APPOINTED ELECTION
ADMINISTRATORS TO REPORT TO THE COUNTY GOVERNING BODY; AMENDING SECTION 13-1-301,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.